Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202547-629
Community correctional programming; paroled offenders.

(1) The Board of Parole may parole an offender to a community correctional facility or program pursuant to guidelines developed by the division.

(2) The Department of Correctional Services shall utilize community correctional facilities and programs as appropriate.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 41;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 12;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 55.